Illinois, session 104th, SB3718.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-215 and by adding Section 27-234 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-215)7    Sec. 27-215. Comprehensive health education program. 8    (a) In this subsection (a):9    "Age and developmentally appropriate" means suitable to 10particular ages or age groups of children or adolescents, 11based on the developing cognitive, emotional, and behavioral 12capacity typical for the age or age group.13    "Consent" means an affirmative, knowing, conscious, 14ongoing, and voluntary agreement to engage in interpersonal, 15physical, or sexual activity, which can be revoked at any 16point, including during the course of interpersonal, physical, 17or sexual activity.18    The program established under this Act shall include, but 19not be limited to, the following major educational areas as a 20basis for curricula in all elementary and secondary schools in 21this State, with applicable Illinois Learning Standards 22adopted by the State Board of Education guiding the 23instruction in the program:  SB3718- 2 -LRB104 19614 LNS 33063 b1        (1) human ecology, health, growth, development, 2    personal health habits, and nutrition, consistent with the 3    Illinois Learning Standards adopted by the State Board of 4    Education;5        (2) the emotional, psychological, physiological, 6    hygienic, and social responsibilities of family life, 7    including evidence-based and medically accurate 8    information regarding sexual abstinence;9        (3) the prevention and control of disease, including 10    instruction in grades 6 through 12 on the prevention, 11    transmission, and spread of AIDS;12        (4) age and developmentally appropriate sexual abuse, 13    consistent with Section 10-23.13 of this Code, abuse 14    during pregnancy, and assault awareness and prevention 15    education in grades prekindergarten through 12;16        (5) public health, environmental health, disaster 17    preparedness education, and safety education;18        (6) mental health and illness;19        (7) dental health;20        (8) cancer education that includes the types of 21    cancer, signs and symptoms, risk factors, the importance 22    of early prevention and detection, and information on 23    where to get help and treatment for cancer; and24        (9) age and developmentally appropriate consent 25    education; and26        (10) gambling and gambling disorders.  SB3718- 3 -LRB104 19614 LNS 33063 b1    The instruction on mental health and illness must evaluate 2the multiple dimensions of health by reviewing the 3relationship between physical and mental health to enhance 4student understanding, attitudes, and behaviors that promote 5health, well-being, and human dignity and must include how and 6where to find mental health resources and specialized 7treatment in the State. The program shall also provide course 8material and instruction to advise pupils of the Abandoned 9Newborn Infant Protection Act.10    Consent education must be age and developmentally 11appropriate, and the instruction on age and developmentally 12appropriate consent shall require only instruction aligning 13with consent as defined in this Section. 14    (b) Notwithstanding the educational areas under subsection 15(a), the following areas may also be included as a basis for 16curricula in all elementary and secondary schools in this 17State: basic first aid (including, but not limited to, 18cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the Heimlich maneuver), 19heart disease, diabetes, stroke, the prevention of child 20abuse, neglect, and suicide, and teen dating violence in 21grades 7 through 12.22    (c) The State Superintendent of Education, in cooperation 23with the Department of Children and Family Services, shall 24prepare and disseminate to all public schools and nonpublic 25schools information on instructional materials and programs 26about child sexual abuse, which may be used by such schools for   SB3718- 4 -LRB104 19614 LNS 33063 b1their own or community programs. Such information may also be 2disseminated by such schools to parents. 3    (d) No pupil shall be required to take or participate in 4any class or course on AIDS or family life instruction or to 5receive training on how to properly administer cardiopulmonary 6resuscitation or how to use an automated external 7defibrillator if his or her parent or guardian submits written 8objection thereto, and refusal to take or participate in the 9course or program or the training shall not be reason for 10suspension or expulsion of the pupil.11(Source: P.A. 104-391, eff. 8-15-25.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/27-234 new)13    Sec. 27-234. Gaming and gaming disorders curriculum. 14Curricula developed under programs established in accordance 15with Section 27-215 in the major educational area of gambling 16and gambling disorders shall include classroom instruction in 17grades 5 through 12. The instruction shall include, at a 18minimum:19        (1) the nature and addictive potential of gambling;20        (2) the risks associated with digital gaming 21    mechanics, including, but not limited to, loot boxes and 22    social casino games;23        (3) the identification of gaming disorders and their 24    impact on mental and physical health; and25        (4) information on how and where to find specialized   SB3718- 5 -LRB104 19614 LNS 33063 b1    treatment and resources in the State for gambling 2    disorders. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42026.